Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1173XS (6) 91 dg/ko S.F. 129 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135B.36 Hospital policies ââ 1 submission to department ââ posting. 2 1. A hospital licensed under this chapter shall no later 3 than September 1, 2025, submit to the department its policies 4 related to all of the following: 5 a. Nondiscrimination. 6 b. Reproductive health care. For purposes of this 7 section, âreproductive health careâ means neonatal care, family 8 planning, long-acting reversible contraception, permanent 9 contraception including tubal ligations and vasectomies, 10 abortion, miscarriage care, maternal hemorrhage care, and 11 vaginal delivery after a previous cesarean section birth. 12 c. If the hospital provides labor and delivery services, 13 whether the hospital has adopted and implemented current 14 best practices or safety bundles recommended by the American 15 college of obstetricians and gynecologists and the alliance for 16 innovation on maternal health, including but not limited to 17 action measures for obstetrical hemorrhage, severe hypertension 18 or preeclampsia, prevention of venous thromboembolism, 19 reduction of low-risk primary cesarean births and support 20 for intended vaginal births, reduction of peripartum racial 21 disparities, and postpartum care access and standards. 22 2. The department shall post a copy of the policies 23 submitted under subsection 1 on the departmentâs internet site 24 and shall develop and implement an interactive online tool that 25 allows the public to compare posted policies. 26 3. If a hospital alters a policy specified under subsection 27 1, the hospital shall submit a copy of the altered policy to 28 the department within thirty calendar days after the hospital 29 approves the alteration. 30 4. A hospital shall post a copy of its most recent policies 31 submitted under the section on the hospitalâs internet site 32 where the policies are readily accessible to the public, 33 without requiring a login credential or otherwise restricting 34 access. 35 -1- LSB 1173XS (6) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 129 Sec. 2. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 1 designate section 135B.36, as enacted in this Act, as a new 2 subchapter within chapter 135B, entitled âpatientâs right to 3 know Actâ. 4